Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1137
Referees; compensation.

The referees shall be allowed such compensation for their services as the court may deem just and proper, which shall be taxed as a part of the costs in the case.

R.S.1867, Code § 306, p. 445;

R.S.1913, § 7875;

C.S.1922, § 8820;

C.S.1929, § 20-1137;

R.S.1943, § 25-1137.

Referee's fees are taxed as part of the costs. Corn Belt Products Co. v. Mullins, 172 Neb. 561, 110 N.W.2d 845 (1961).